Nebraska, session 109, LB501.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 77-1301, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-1301 (1) All real property in this state subject to taxation shall be
assessed as of January 1 at 12:01 a.m., and such assessment shall be used as a
basis of taxation until the next assessment unless the property is damaged
destroyed real property as defined in section 77-1307, in which case the
assessed value for the damaged destroyed real property shall be adjusted as
provided in sections 77-1307 to 77-1309.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2014, in any county with a population of at least
one hundred fifty thousand inhabitants according to the most recent federal
decennial census, the county assessor shall provide notice of preliminary
valuations to real property owners on or before January 15 of each year. Such
notice shall be (a) mailed to the taxpayer or (b) published on a website
maintained by the county assessor or by the county.
(3) The county assessor shall complete the assessment of real property on
or before March 19 of each year, except beginning January 1, 2014, in any
county with a population of at least one hundred fifty thousand inhabitants
according to the most recent federal decennial census, the county assessor
shall complete the assessment of real property on or before March 25 of each
year.
Sec. 2. Section 77-1307, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1307 (1) The Legislature finds and declares that fires, earthquakes,
floods, and tornadoes, and other events causing significant property damage
occur with enough frequency in this state that provision should be made to
grant property tax relief to owners of real property adversely affected by such
events.
(2) For purposes of sections 77-1307 to 77-1309:
(a) Calamity means a disastrous event, including, but not limited to, a
fire, an earthquake, a flood, a tornado, or other natural event which
significantly affects the assessed value of real property;
(a) Damaged (b) Destroyed real property means real property that suffers
significant property damage as a result of a calamity occurring on or after
January 1 , 2019, and before July 1 of the current assessment year. Damaged
Destroyed real property does not include property suffering significant
property damage that is caused by the owner of the property; and
(b) (c) Significant property damage means:
(i) Damage to an improvement exceeding twenty percent of the improvement's
assessed value in the current tax year as determined by the county assessor; or
(ii) Damage to land exceeding twenty percent of the land's a parcel's
assessed land value in the current tax year. as determined by the county
assessor; or
(iii) Damage exceeding twenty percent of the property's assessed value in
the current tax year as determined by the county assessor if (A) such property
is located in an area that has been declared a disaster area by the Governor
and (B) a housing inspector or health inspector has determined that the
property is uninhabitable or unlivable.
Sec. 3. Section 77-1308, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1308 (1) If real property suffers significant property damage prior to
July 1 of becomes destroyed real property during the current assessment year,
the property owner shall file a report of the damaged destroyed real property
with the county assessor and county clerk of the county in which the property
is located on or before July 15 of the current assessment year. The report of
damaged destroyed real property shall be made on a form prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner.
(2) If the damaged destroyed real property was a mobile home that was
moved pursuant to section 77-3708 and required to pay an accelerated tax
pursuant to section 77-1725.01, the property owner shall report the damaged
destroyed real property on or before July 15 in the same manner as other real
property. The property owner may make a request for refund of the accelerated
tax paid pursuant to section 77-1734.01 for any portion of value reduced by the
county board of equalization pursuant to section 77-1309.
(3) The county assessor shall inspect and review all properties for which
a report has been filed under this section and shall submit a comprehensive
-1-

LB501 LB501
2025 2025
report of all such properties to the county board of equalization on or before
July 20 of the current assessment year. The county assessor's report shall be
made on a form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner and shall include all reports
filed under this section by property owners. The county board of equalization
shall consider any report of destroyed real property received from the county
assessor pursuant to this section, and the assessment of such property shall be
made by the county board of equalization in accordance with section 77-1309.
After county board of equalization action pursuant to section 77-1309, the
county assessor shall correct the current year's assessment roll as provided in
section 77-1613.02.
Sec. 4. Section 77-1309, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-1309 (1) When If the county board of equalization receives a report of
damaged destroyed real property from the county assessor pursuant to section
77-1308, the county board of equalization shall adjust the assessed value of
the damaged destroyed real property to its assessed value on the date it
suffers significant property damage.
(2) The county board of equalization may meet on or after June 1 and on or
before July 25, or on or before August 10 if the board has adopted a resolution
to extend the deadline for hearing protests under section 77-1502, for the
purpose of considering the assessed value of damaged destroyed real property
pursuant to this section. Any action of the county board of equalization which
changes the assessed value of damaged destroyed real property pursuant to this
section shall be for the current assessment year only.
(3) The county board of equalization shall give notice of the assessed
value of the damaged destroyed real property to the record owner or agent at
his or her last-known address. Protests of the assessed value proposed for
damaged destroyed real property pursuant to this section shall be filed with
the county board of equalization within thirty days after the mailing of the
notice. All provisions of section 77-1502 except dates for filing a protest,
the period for hearing protests, and the date for mailing notice of the county
board of equalization's decision are applicable to any protest filed pursuant
to this section. The county board of equalization shall issue its decision on
the protest within thirty days after the filing of the protest. Within seven
days after the county board of equalization's final decision, the county clerk
shall mail to the protester written notice of the decision. The notice shall
contain a statement advising the protester that a report of the decision is
available at the county clerk's or county assessor's office, whichever is
appropriate.
(4) The action of the county board of equalization upon a protest filed
pursuant to this section may be appealed to the Tax Equalization and Review
Commission within thirty days after the board's final decision.
Sec. 5. Section 77-1725.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-1725.01 Except in any city or village that has adopted a building code
with provisions for demolition of unsafe buildings or structures, it shall be
the duty of any assessor, sheriff, constable, city council member, and village
trustee to at once inform the county treasurer of the removal or demolition of
or a levy of attachment upon any item of real property known to him or her.
Except for property considered to be damaged destroyed real property as defined
in section 77-1307, it shall be the duty of the county treasurer to immediately
proceed with the collection of any delinquent or current taxes when such acts
become known to him or her in any manner. Except for property considered to be
damaged destroyed real property as defined in section 77-1307, the taxes shall
be due and collectible, which taxes shall include taxes on all real property
then assessed upon which the tax shall be computed on the basis of the last
preceding levy, and a distress warrant shall be issued when (1) any person
attempts to remove or demolish all or a substantial portion of his or her real
property or (2) a levy of attachment is made upon the real property. From the
date the taxes are due and collectible, the taxes shall be a first lien upon
the personal property of the person to whom assessed until paid.
Sec. 6. Original sections 77-1301, 77-1307, 77-1308, 77-1309, and
77-1725.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 7. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-2-